Utah statutes.
59-12-805.   Distribution of revenues generated by rural city hospital tax.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection 59-12-804(5) and Subsection (2), all
revenues collected by a city under Section 59-12-804 shall be distributed
quarterly by the city legislative body to rural city hospitals.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), if there is more than one rural city
hospital in a city, the revenues collected by the city under Section 59-12-804
shall be distributed as determined by the city legislative body.
